Missouri, session 2026, SB1084.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 251.034, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 251.034,
to read as follows:
251.034. Payments made under sections 251.032 to
251.038 to the various regional planning commissions shall
be distributed on a matching basis of one-half state funds
for one-half of local funds. No local unit shall receive
any payment without providing the matching funds required.
The state funds so allocated shall not exceed the sum of
[sixty-five] one hundred thirty thousand dollars for the
East-West Gateway Coordinating Council and for the Mid-
America Regional Council. The remaining allocated state
funds shall not exceed the sum of [twenty-five] fifty
thousand dollars for each of the following regional planning
commissions: South Central Ozark, Ozark Foothills, Green
Hills, [Show-Me,] Bootheel, [Missouri Valley, Ozark
Gateway,] Mark Twain, [ABCD,] Southeast Missouri, Boonslick,
Northwest Missouri, Mid-Missouri, Kaysinger Basin, Lake of
the Ozarks, Meramec, Northeast Missouri, Harry S Truman, MO-
Kan, Pioneer Trails, and [Lakes Country] Southwest
Missouri. Beginning July 1, 2027, and each year after, the
maximum grant amount for each regional planning commission
shall be adjusted with the consumer price index.
1